Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5028.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 37-13-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 37-13 entitled "Labor and
Payment of Debts by Contractors" is hereby amended to read as follows:
37-13-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Public works” means any public work for any municipality, city, town, or any quasi-
municipal public entity, and the State of Rhode Island or any quasi-state public entity, consisting
of grading, clearing, demolition, improvement, completion, repair, alteration, or construction of
any public road or any bridge, or portion thereof, or any public building, or portion thereof, or any
heavy construction, or any public works projects of any nature or kind whatsoever.
(2) “School transportation services” means those transportation and related services
provided for the transportation of public and private students pursuant to §§ 16-21-1 and 16-21.1-
8.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000320
========